Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 9

Tennessee Local Development Authority Leaking Underground Storage Funding Act of 1997

4-31-901. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Local Development Authority Leaking Underground Storage Funding Act of 1997.”

Acts 1997, ch. 444, § 2.

4-31-902. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that the costs incurred in connection with reasonable and safe cleanup with respect to petroleum sites within the state, as provided in title 68, chapter 215, part 1, are extensive and threaten the state's ability to meet its obligations with respect to the environment.

It is accordingly in furtherance of the interests and welfare of all Tennesseans that the Tennessee local development authority, referred to in this part as the “authority,” be empowered to issue revenue bonds and notes and to make the proceeds available to the petroleum underground storage tank board for purposes of providing for the reimbursement of reasonable and safe cleanup of petroleum sites.

It is intended that the authority be vested with all powers necessary to accomplish these purposes.

Acts 1997, ch. 444, § 2.

4-31-903. Bonds authorized.

For the purpose of providing moneys for deposit with the petroleum underground storage tank board, the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise created by law, has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority in an amount not to exceed fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in accordance with the terms of this part.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this part shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to any other provisions of this chapter or any other law; provided, that the foregoing shall not prohibit the issuance of separate issues of bonds or notes pursuant to this part.

In addition to powers otherwise granted by law, the authority has the power and is authorized to enter into a funding agreement with the petroleum underground storage tank board.

The authority shall determine the amount as will be at least sufficient, together with other funds available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds and notes issued by the authority and to fund a debt service reserve fund. The authority may collect an administrative fee in addition to such schedule for repayment of debt. Such schedule for repayment of debt shall be provided to the commissioners of finance and administration, revenue and environment and conservation.

Prior to the issuance of any debt, there shall be a determination by the authority as to the sufficiency of the tax collections to service such debt.

Acts 1997, ch. 444, § 2.

4-31-904. Authorization by resolution — Payment.

The bonds and notes shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, secured by the deposit of the assurance fee required under § 68-215-110, under such terms and conditions as deemed appropriate by the authority; provided, that such debt, including any renewals or extensions, shall not be outstanding longer than twenty (20) years or the useful life for the funded cleanup, whichever is shorter.

Such bonds and notes of the authority shall not constitute a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, and the holders or owners of such bonds and notes shall have no right to have taxes levied by the general assembly, or any other taxing authority within the state for the payment of the principal, premium, if any, and interest on such bonds and notes, but such bonds and notes shall be payable solely from the revenues and moneys pledged for their payment.

Acts 1997, ch. 444, § 2.